Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROPOSAL FOR REGULATION OF ITINERANT FOOD SALES.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "itinerant food sales" means the sale of food, including beverages, from an establishment that does not have a permanent location and that is movable from place to place. Itinerant food sales include but are not limited to operations conducted from a food cart, mobile foot unit, seasonal temporary food stand, special event food stand, or other vehicle, cart, or portable structure. An itinerant food sales establishment may be motorized or nonmotorized and may operate for a limited or extended time period at a location, provided that the establishment is not permanently affixed to the site. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health and commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with all community health boards and local entities with delegated authority from the commissioner of health or commissioner of agriculture for food regulation, and with Minnesota's 11 federally recognized, sovereign Tribal Nations with food regulatory authority on Tribal land, must develop a simplified proposal to regulate itinerant food sales in Minnesota. The proposal must eliminate the duplicative regulation of business operators by the state and municipalities and must ensure continued consumer safety through food safety inspections and enforcement in all areas of Minnesota subject to the state's jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (c) The proposal must include: new text end new text begin (1) a conceptual description of how public health efforts will be coordinated among the relevant food safety authorities; new text end new text begin (2) changes to Minnesota Statutes that are needed to implement the proposal; new text end new text begin (3) a fiscal analysis showing predicted budgetary impacts of the proposal on food regulatory agencies; and new text end new text begin (4) a description of the actions needed for implementation and related timelines for implementation. new text end new text begin (d) No later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner of health and commissioner of agriculture must submit a report on the proposal to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and agriculture. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROPOSAL FOR REGULATION OF ITINERANT FOOD SALES.new text end new text begin $95,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the commissioner of health and commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with stakeholders, to develop a proposal for the regulation of itinerant food sales in the state. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end